Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-123 Records of insurance producer.
(a) Every insurance producer shall keep a record of all transactions
consummated under the producer's license. The record required by this section shall
be in a form organized according to class of insurance and shall include:

(1) A record of each insurance contract procured or
issued, together with the names of the insurers and insureds, the amount of
premium paid or to be paid or the basis of the premium or consideration paid or
to be paid, and a statement of the subject of the insurance; and

(2) Other and additional information as shall be
customary, or as may reasonably be required by the commissioner.

(b) All the records as to any particular
transaction shall be kept in the licensee's office and shall be available and
open to the inspection of the commissioner during business hours during the
five years immediately after the date of the completion of the transaction.

(c) This section shall not apply to life or
accident and health or sickness insurance if the records required of the
insurance are customarily maintained in the offices of the insurer.

(d) This section shall not apply to motor
vehicle or homeowners insurance if the records required of the insurance are
maintained electronically, accessible by the producer, and available within one
business day. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §34; am L 2011, c 7,
§1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next